Massachusetts, session 194th, H3633.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
2 is hereby amended by: —
3 (a) inserting after section 7Z the following section: -
4 “Section 7Z1/2. Station Reporting Requirement. The registrar shall maintain a database
5 containing the mileage of every motor vehicle registered pursuant to this chapter. Every facility
6 licensed to conduct vehicle inspections pursuant to this chapter, shall, as part of said inspection,
7 record the make, model, owner’s name, license plate number, and mileage of each vehicle
8 inspected and shall report said information to the registrar and the commissioner. Said reports
1 of 28

9 shall be made electronically and said facilities shall have electronic access to the database
10 pursuant to procedures established by the registrar.”; and
11 (b) inserting after section 34R the following sections: -
12 Section 34S. Vehicle Classification. For purposes of sections 34T and 34U only, the
13 registrar shall issue rules and regulations to classify all vehicles required to be registered by this
14 chapter into the following categories: zero emission vehicle, motorcycle, automobile, hybrid
15 automobile, light truck, heavy truck, hybrid truck, sports utility vehicle, hybrid sports utility
16 vehicle, van, luxury vehicle, motor home, trailer, other emission producing vehicle and rental
17 vehicle, which shall include all vehicles intended as of the date of registration to be used as a
18 rental vehicle. Said categories shall be known collectively as registration classes. When any such
19 vehicle is first registered pursuant to this chapter, the registrar shall identify said vehicle as a
20 member of one such registration class.”;
21 Section 34T. Green Fee. The registrar or his authorized agents shall collect the following
22 fees, to be called green fees, each time a vehicle is registered or the vehicle registration is
23 renewed for any reason, in the following amounts:
24 (1) For every automobile, hybrid truck and hybrid sports utility vehicle the fee shall be
25 $30 for a new or transfer registration and 2 year renewals, $15 for vehicles renewing annually.
26 (2) For every zero emission vehicle, electric vehicle, hybrid automobile, and motorcycle
27 the fee shall be $15 for a new or transfer registration and for 2 year renewals, $7.50 for vehicles
28 renewing annually.
2 of 28

29 (3) For every light truck, van, luxury vehicle and sports utility vehicle the fee shall be $40
30 for a new or transfer registration and for 2 year renewals, $20 for vehicles renewing annually.
31 (4) For every heavy truck, motor home and bus the fee shall be $85 for a new or transfer
32 registration and for 2 year renewals, $42.50 for vehicles renewing annually.
33 (5) For every other emission producing vehicle the fee shall be $60 for a new or transfer
34 registration and for 2 year renewals, $30 for vehicles renewing annually.
35 (6) Any vehicle owned by any subdivision of the commonwealth and used solely for
36 official business and any vehicle identified in subsections 29, 30 and 33 of section 33 of chapter
37 90 shall be exempt from the green fee.”;
38 Section 34U. Emissions Fee. At the time of each inspection required by section 7V, the
39 inspector shall collect and remit to the registrar the following fee, to be called an emissions fee.
40 Said fee shall equal $0.001 per mile for each mile driven by the vehicle since the vehicle’s last
41 inspection, calculated using the mileage reports recorded in the database maintained by the
42 registrar pursuant to section 7Z1/1, or, if the vehicle has not yet had 2 required inspections, equal
43 to the vehicle’s mileage at the inspection.”;
44 Section 34V. Car Rental Fee. There shall be a surcharge of 5 per cent of the total cost of
45 each vehicular rental transaction contract in the commonwealth, which shall be administered by
46 the commissioner of revenue. Each vendor shall collect the surcharge and remit it to the
47 department of revenue on a monthly basis. All provisions of chapter 62C of the General Laws
48 relative to assessment, collection, payment, abatement, verification and administration, including
49 penalties and interest, shall, so far as pertinent, apply to this surcharge as though it were a tax
50 enumerated in section 2 of said chapter 62C.”; and
3 of 28

51 Section 34W. Parking Rental Fee. There shall be a surcharge of 5 per cent of the total
52 cost charged to park a vehicle in the commonwealth, which shall be administered by the
53 commissioner of revenue. Each vendor shall collect the surcharge and remit it to the department
54 of revenue on a monthly basis. All provisions of chapter 62C of the General Laws relative to
55 assessment, collection, payment, abatement, verification and administration, including penalties
56 and interest, shall, so far as pertinent, apply to this surcharge as though it were a tax enumerated
57 in section 2 of said chapter 62C. Said surcharge shall not apply to parking owned by the
58 commonwealth or a subdivision or authority thereof.”.
59 SECTION 2. Section 13 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
60 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:
61 (d) Tolls on Large Commercial Trucks Only.
62 (1) Notwithstanding subsection (c), the department may further charge and collect, and
63 from time to time, fix and revise tolls paid by large commercial trucks, as defined pursuant to
64 Federal Highway Administration (FHWA) vehicle classification schedule as any vehicle within
65 Class 8—single trailer, 3 or 4 axles up to and including Class 13—7 or more axle multi-trailer
66 trucks, as such classifications may be revised from time to time by the FHWA, for the privilege
67 of traveling on Massachusetts roads, including—
68 (i) on Route 95 Rhode Island to Route 95 New Hampshire, or the reverse;
69 (ii) on Route 91 Connecticut to Route 91 New Hampshire, or the reverse;
70 (iii) on Route 93 Massachusetts to Route 93 New Hampshire, or the reverse; and
71 (iv) any other trip designated by the department.
4 of 28

72 (2) Such tolls shall be collected on large commercial trucks only and may not be
73 collected on any other vehicle; provided, however, no vehicle shall be tolled other than a tractor
74 or truck tractor as defined in 23 C.F.R. 658.5, pulling a trailer or trailers.
75 SECTION 3. The General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, are hereby
76 amended by inserting after chapter 161D the following chapter:-
77 CHAPTER 161E
78 TRANSPORTATION AND ENVIRONMENT EQUITY FUND
79 Section 1. Definitions. In this chapter—
80 (a) the term “car rental fee” means the fee established pursuant to section 34V of chapter
81 90;
82 (b) the term “cost” as applied to a project and the site thereof, means all costs, whenever
83 incurred, of acquiring land and of acquiring, developing, constructing, improving, furnishing,
84 equipping, finishing and carrying out a project and placing the same in operation, including
85 without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the cost of all lands, property, rights, easements
86 and interests acquired pursuant hereto and all labor, materials, machinery and equipment
87 necessary to carry out a project and place the same in operation, financing charges, interest prior
88 to and during construction and for a period not exceeding two years after completion of
89 construction, the cost of environmental investigation, analyses and remediation, the cost of
90 demolition and removal of any buildings or structures on lands acquired and removal or
91 relocation of any public utilities and other facilities, relocation payments as defined in, and any
92 other costs of relocation assistance required under chapter 79A of the General Laws and this
5 of 28

93 chapter, the costs of architectural, engineering and legal services, plans, specifications, surveys,
94 estimates of cost and of revenues, other expenses necessary or incident to determining the
95 feasibility or practicability of the project, administrative, marketing and promotion expenses,
96 reserves for debt service, and other capital and current expenses and such other expenses as may
97 be necessary or incident to the construction of a project and the acquisition of land therefore;
98 (c) the term “emissions fee” means the fee established pursuant to section 34U of chapter
99 90;
100 (d) the term “green fee” means the fee established pursuant to section 34T of chapter 90;
101 (e) the term “MassDOT” means the Massachusetts department of transportation,
102 established pursuant to chapter 6A, or its successor;
103 (f) the term “operating costs” means all direct costs, whenever incurred, of operating a
104 project that received funding from the Fund pursuant to this chapter;
105 (g) the term “parking rental fee” means the fee established pursuant to section 34W of
106 chapter 90;
107 (h) the term “project” means the planning, design, acquisition, development,
108 construction, expansion, rehabilitation, improvement, furnishing, equipping and finishing or any
109 combination of the foregoing, necessary to provide subway or commuter rail service to a
110 municipality that does not have such service or to increase the frequency or speed of such service
111 to a community that the secretary determines is underserved by its existing subway or commuter
112 rail service or to expand access by road to a municipality or municipalities that the secretary
113 deems would not be well served by subway or commuter rail service, together with all necessary
6 of 28

114 and related furnishings, machinery, equipment, facilities, approaches, driveways, walkways,
115 parking facilities, roadways, public transportation and landscaping, and including without
116 limitation the acquisition of lands or other property, or rights, easements, and interests acquired
117 for or in respect of any such lands or property for a project, the demolition or removal of any
118 buildings or structures on lands so acquired or in or with respect to which interests are so
119 acquired, relocation payments and other assistance therefore, and site preparation and
120 environmental remediation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, project may not include funds for
121 routine maintenance to existing subway or commuter rail facilities or for capital projects to
122 improve the accessibility of existing infrastructure for passengers with disabilities or to improve
123 access to existing service, such as parking expansion, installation of bicycle racks or
124 improvements to pedestrian approaches;
125 (i) the term “registrar” means the registrar of motor vehicles, established pursuant to
126 chapter 90; and
127 (j) the term “secretary” means the secretary of MassDOT.
128 Section 2. Creation of the Massachusetts Transportation and Environment Equity Fund.
129 There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate fund,
130 to be known as the Massachusetts Transportation and Environment Equity Fund (in this chapter
131 referred to as the “Fund”), consisting of amounts credited to the fund in accordance with section
132 3. The Fund shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of this chapter by the state
133 treasurer and shall be held in trust exclusively for the purposes and the beneficiaries described
134 herein. The state treasurer shall be treasurer-custodian of the Fund and shall have the custody of
135 its moneys and securities.
7 of 28

136 Section 3. The Massachusetts Transportation and Environment Equity Fund.
137 (a) The following receipts shall be credited to, and deposited by the state treasurer into
138 the Fund and used in accordance with this section:
139 (1) The proceeds from $0.02 per gallon of the fee collected in the previous fiscal year,
140 pursuant to chapter 21J of the General Laws.
141 (2) The green fee.
142 (3) The emissions fee.
143 (4) The car rental fee.
144 (5) The parking rental fee.
145 (6) The proceeds from the commercial truck toll, as described in section 13(d) of chapter
146 6C.
147 (b) In accordance with section 7 of this chapter, the local project receipts shall be credited
148 to, and deposited by the state treasurer in the Fund and shall be kept in segregated accounts for
149 each project to be used in accordance with this chapter.
150 Section 4. Capital Investment Projects.
151 (a) In General. Notwithstanding any General Law or special law to the contrary, the
152 secretary shall annually rank all projects contained in MassDOT’s capital investment plan,
153 electrification, resiliency. The secretary shall group said projects into 2 groups in accordance
154 with subsection (b).
8 of 28

155 (b) Project Groupings.
156 (1) The first group of ranked projects, as defined in subsection (a), shall include those of
157 said projects that would provide new rail service to a city or town in the commonwealth that does
158 not have a commuter rail stop within its borders or, if a project would establish new stations in
159 more than one city or town, those projects that would provide new subway or commuter rail
160 service to cities or towns in the commonwealth half or more of whom do not have a subway or
161 commuter rail stop within their borders.
162 (2) The second group of ranked projects, as defined in subsection (a), shall include all
163 projects contained in said capital investment program that are not included in the first group, as
164 defined in paragraph (1). The secretary shall rank the projects within each group based on each
165 project’s performance relative to the other projects in that group on the following evaluation
166 criteria:
167 (i) The cost effectiveness of air quality improvements which the capital investment
168 program predicts a project would achieve.
169 (ii) The project’s projected cost per rider.
170 (iii) The likely economic benefits of a project.
171 (iv) The likelihood that a project will result in smart growth development, rather than
172 sprawl.
173 (v) Whether a project would serve any environmental justice target, all as defined and
174 described in the capital investment program.
175 (vi) The project’s plan for electrification and resiliency.
9 of 28

176 (3) The secretary shall report said ranking of projects, described in paragraphs (1) and
177 (2), along with the secretary’s reasons therefore to the clerk of the senate and the clerk of the
178 house and the joint committee on transportation and the house and senate committees on
179 bonding, capital expenditures and state assets no later than January 31 of each year.
180 Section 5. Project Notification and Reports.
181 (a) The secretary shall notify the state treasurer and the clerks of the senate and of the
182 house in writing when the secretary determines—
183 (1) that the Fund contains and is likely to continue to contain funds, less those funds
184 already committed to other projects but including those local project revenues dedicated to a
185 project pursuant to this chapter, necessary to cover—
186 (i) the cost of the project ranked first in the first group, as described in section 4(b)(1) by
187 the secretary pursuant to section 4, less all other funds available to MassDOT to cover such cost,
188 calculated based on not less than 105 per cent of the debt service on all special obligation bonds
189 to be issued pursuant to section 17 that are required to cover the cost of such project; and
190 (ii) the amount of any projected annual operating deficit determined by MassDOT,
191 calculated as the average of the projected operating deficits of the first 10 years of the project’s
192 operation; and
193 (2) that all plans, approvals, licenses and permits necessary to begin construction of said
194 project are in MassDOT’s possession. Upon the sale of bonds by the state treasurer for a project
195 described herein, that project shall be removed from the secretary’s group rankings made
196 pursuant to section 4.
10 of 28

197 (b) Subsequent to the first project having been removed from the secretary’s group
198 rankings pursuant to subsection (a), the secretary shall notify the state treasurer and the clerks of
199 the senate and of the house in writing when the secretary determines—
200 (1) that the Fund contains and is likely to continue to contain funds, minus those funds
201 already committed to other projects but including those local project revenues dedicated to a
202 project pursuant to this chapter, necessary to cover—
203 (i) the cost of either or both, if available funds exist, of the projects ranked first in
204 grouped projects, as described in section 4(b), by the secretary pursuant to section 4 less all other
205 funds available to MassDOT to cover such cost, calculated based on not less than 105 per cent of
206 the debt service on all special obligation bonds to be issued pursuant hereto that are required to
207 cover the cost of such project; and
208 (ii) the amount of any projected annual operating deficit determined by MassDOT,
209 calculated as the average of the projected operating deficits of the first 10 years of the project’s
210 operation; and
211 (2) that all plans, approvals, licenses and permits necessary to begin construction of said
212 project are in MassDOT’s possession. Upon the sale of bonds by the state treasurer for a project
213 pursuant hereto, that the project shall be removed from the secretary’s group rankings, as
214 described in section 4(b).
215 (c) No later than 90 days after receiving said determination, the secretary shall certify to
216 the state treasurer that the secretary has received said determination and that said determination
217 meets the requirements of this chapter and shall name the next project to be funded. In making
11 of 28

218 this choice, the secretary shall continue to give preference, in the secretary’s discretion, to the
219 first group projects, as described in section 4(b)(1).
220 (d) Determinations described in subsections (a) and (b), shall include—
221 (1) project plans sufficiently complete to indicate the project’s boundaries, such land
222 acquisition, demolition and removal of structures, and such redevelopment and general public
223 improvements, as may be proposed to be carried out and proposed land uses including
224 preliminary project designs and a description of the project programs;
225 (2) the proposed method for relocation of persons and organizations to be displaced by
226 the project, if any;
227 (3) cost estimates of the project, including acquisition, and identification of parcels to be
228 acquired and the estimated cost thereof;
229 (4) proposals for informing and communicating with the affected communities; and
230 (5) a description of measures to mitigate environmental and neighborhood impacts of the
231 project and such other planning and urban design issues as MassDOT shall determine are
232 presented by the project.
233 (e) MassDOT’s Right of Entry with Respect to Report Filings.
234 (1) In connection with the preparation of the plans described in subsection (d) and
235 MassDOT’s exercise of its powers under this chapter, MassDOT and its authorized agents and
236 contractors may enter onto any properties and the improvements thereon and undertake
237 appraisals, surveys, environmental analyses and investigations, including subsurface
12 of 28

238 investigations, permitting analyses and investigations, and other investigations and analyses, for
239 the purpose of determining the value and condition of such properties.
240 (2) Prior to any such entry pursuant to this subsection, MassDOT shall provide 20 days
241 written notice by certified mail to the owners of properties, as such owners are recorded in the
242 office of the city assessor.
243 (3) Such entry, appraisals, surveys, analyses and investigations shall not be deemed a
244 trespass, a taking by eminent domain or an entry under any eminent domain or condemnation
245 proceedings.
246 (4) MassDOT shall make reimbursement for any actual injury or actual damage resulting
247 to such properties and any improvements thereon from the entry, appraisals, surveys, analyses
248 and investigations authorized hereunder, and MassDOT shall, as far as possible, restore such
249 properties and the improvements thereon to their condition prior to such entry, appraisals,
250 surveys, analyses and investigations.
251 (5) Without derogating from the foregoing, MassDOT is hereby authorized to exercise
252 the power of eminent domain as provided in section 11(d) of chapter 121B of the General Laws
253 in order to temporarily obtain access to properties and the improvements thereon for MassDOT
254 and its agents and contractors for the purpose of conducting the appraisals, surveys, analyses and
255 investigations authorized by this chapter. If MassDOT restores the properties and improvements
256 as required hereunder, the damages for the temporary taking hereby authorized shall be nominal
257 in the absence of extraordinary circumstances unique to particular properties.
258 Section 6. In order to provide for a portion of the costs of each project and the payment of
259 the principal of and interest on special obligation bonds of the commonwealth issued pursuant
13 of 28

260 hereto, there is hereby established on the first day of the first full calendar year following the
261 notifications made by the secretary described in section 5 district improvement financing districts
262 in the city or town or any portion thereof that will receive one or more new stations or enhanced
263 service as part of said project and any portion of any other city or town designated by the
264 governor that is adjacent to a city or town that will receive one or more new stations or enhanced
265 service as part of said project, which shall operate in accordance with the provisions of section 1
266 of chapter 40Q.
267 Section 7. Commencing on the first day of the first full calendar year following the
268 notifications by the secretary described in section 5, the receipts collected pursuant to section 6,
269 together with investment earnings thereon, shall be credited to, and deposited by the state
270 treasurer in the segregated account within the Fund created by the state treasurer for each project
271 pursuant to section 3. Notwithstanding section 35J of chapter 10, amounts described in this
272 section shall not be included in the computation of the amount to be deposited in the
273 Massachusetts Tourism Fund pursuant to said section 35J.
274 Section 8. For all projects constructed pursuant to this chapter all construction employees
275 employed in the construction of said project shall be paid no less than the wage rate established
276 for such work pursuant to a project labor agreement with the appropriate labor organization or
277 labor organizations, which includes—
278 (a) a uniform grievance and arbitration procedure for the resolution of work-related
279 disputes on job sites;
280 (b) mutually agreeable uniform work rules and schedules for the project; and
14 of 28

281 (c) an obligation for any such labor organization and its constituent members not to strike
282 with respect to work on such project, provided that it shall not be a precondition to the award of a
283 contract that a bidder have previously entered into a collective bargaining agreement with a labor
284 organization, but only that the bidder be willing to execute and comply with said project labor
285 agreement for the project if it is awarded a contract.
286 Section 9. Expenditures of Fund Funds.
287 (a) Expenditures from Fund funds not segregated pursuant to section 3 shall be made for
288 the following purposes only if and when the amounts available in each project’s segregated fund,
289 created pursuant to section 3, are inadequate to the meet the cost or operating costs of that
290 Project:
291 (1) For the payment of the principal, including sinking fund payments and premium, if
292 any, and interest on special obligation bonds of the commonwealth issued pursuant hereto and on
293 notes issued in anticipation of such bonds for the relevant project.
294 (2) For the maintenance of, or provision for, any reserves for debt service and other
295 capital and current expenses, including without limitation any capital reserve fund created for
296 such purpose, and for any additional security, insurance or other form of credit enhancement
297 required or provided for in any trust or other security agreement entered into pursuant to this
298 chapter to secure such bonds.
299 (3) For direct expenditure for any cost of a project funded pursuant to this chapter and for
300 the operation, promotion and marketing thereof incurred by MassDOT.
15 of 28

301 (b) Should the secretary determine that amounts contained in the Fund exceed those
302 necessary to fund project costs, the state treasurer shall transfer at the direction of the secretary
303 up to $25,000,000 annually into the Regional Transit Authorities Forward Funding Trust Fund,
304 created by section 63A of chapter 10 of the General Laws. After any such transfer, the secretary
305 may direct some or all of the balance of the Fund to MassDOT to cover costs incurred by
306 MassDOT for any purposes.
307 Section 10. MassDOT Acquisition of Property.
308 (a) MassDOT shall acquire all lands, properties, rights, air rights, sub-surface rights,
309 easements and other interests necessary to complete the projects.
310 (b) Acquisition Authority.
311 (1) For purposes of this section, MassDOT may take by eminent domain under chapter 79
312 or chapter 80A of the General Laws, or acquire by purchase, lease, gift, bequest, grant or
313 otherwise from any party, public or private, and hold, clear, repair, operate and, after having
314 taken or acquired the same, convey as provided in this chapter, any lands and other property, real
315 or personal, improved or unimproved, tangible or intangible, and any interest therein, including,
316 to the extent not inconsistent with federal law, railroad properties, necessary to complete the
317 projects, as stipulated in the reports to be produced pursuant to section 5, after a public hearing
318 of which the land owners of record have been notified by certified mail and of which at least 20
319 days’ notice has been given by publication in a newspaper having general circulation in the city
320 in which the land is located; provided, however, that no such taking or acquisition shall be
321 effected until 30 days after MassDOT has notified the land owner of record by certified mail and
16 of 28

322 has caused a notice of such determination to be published in a newspaper having general
323 circulation in the city in which the land is located.
324 (2) The value of any lands or real property acquired by MassDOT by eminent domain
325 shall be reduced by the costs necessary to remediate the environment of said site.
326 (3) To the extent not inconsistent with Federal law, the taking or other acquisition by
327 MassDOT of railroad rights of way or related facilities from any department, authority, agency
328 or political subdivision of the commonwealth, from any railroad company, or from any other
329 party, shall be exempt from the procedures, findings and requirements of section 7 of chapter
330 161C of the General Laws.
331 (c) For purposes of any constitutional entitlement to damages in the event of a taking, all
332 properties and interests taken by MassDOT by eminent domain by any subdivision of the
333 commonwealth are being held by MassDOT in a governmental and not a proprietary capacity
334 and it is not the intent of this chapter to confer on MassDOT any rights to damages for such
335 taking. Any such taking of property shall be effective notwithstanding any inconsistent prior
336 public use. MassDOT may make relocation payments to persons and businesses displaced as a
337 result of carrying out a project and shall otherwise provide relocation assistance as provided in
338 chapter 79A and chapter 121B of the General Laws. To the extent not inconsistent with federal
339 law, if there is a taking or other acquisition of railroad lines, rights of way, easements or related
340 facilities from any party, MassDOT shall relocate such railroad lines.
341 (d) MassDOT shall have all the powers necessary and convenient to carry out the
342 purposes of this chapter. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, MassDOT may
343 exercise with respect to the projects and any property acquired in accordance with this section all
17 of 28

344 powers, and shall have all immunities, consistent with this chapter, granted to operating
345 agencies, as defined in chapter 121B of the General Laws or otherwise granted to MassDOT
346 under any General Law or special law.
347 (e) MassDOT is hereby authorized and directed to prepare or cause to be prepared a
348 report in accordance with section 62B of chapter 30 of the General Laws for those of the projects
349 for which such a report has not yet been prepared or is no longer valid at the time required by
350 law. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 62 to 62H, inclusive, of said chapter 30,
351 MassDOT may commence and undertake research, planning, design and other work necessary
352 for the projects and may engage an owner's representative, architects and engineers and a
353 construction manager therefore for each project individually, and MassDOT may take all actions
354 necessary or appropriate or required for acquisition of lands, air rights, sub-surface rights or
355 other property interests prior to the publication of a final environmental impact report pursuant to
356 this section and section 62C of said chapter 30; provided, however, that MassDOT shall not
357 record a notice of taking with respect to any lands or other property by eminent domain as
358 provided in this section until the secretary of energy and environmental affairs has issued a
359 notice of availability of a report submitted to said secretary in accordance with said section 62C
360 which demonstrates to the satisfaction of said secretary that a project may be carried out with
361 appropriate mitigation measures as may be necessary to minimize and prevent damage to the
362 environment.
363 (f) MassDOT shall be excluded from the definition of an owner or operator of a project
364 with respect to releases of hazardous materials that occur before MassDOT acquires ownership
365 of any portion of a site pursuant to this chapter upon or from which such a release may occur as
366 if MassDOT were a city or town that has purchased or taken such land for the nonpayment of
18 of 28

367 taxes, in accordance with the definition of "owner" or "operator" contained in paragraph (d) of
368 section 2 of chapter 21E of the General Laws; provided, however, that MassDOT complies with
369 all of the requirements set forth in paragraphs (d)(2) and (d)(3) of said section 2 of said chapter
370 21E, except that MassDOT shall have no obligation to comply with subsection (d)(3)(F) of said
371 section 2 of said chapter 21E.
372 Section 11. MassDOT Requirements.
373 (a) No person shall be precluded by chapters 7 or 268A of the General Laws from
374 participating by contract or otherwise in the activities of the commonwealth or MassDOT with
375 regard to the planning, acquisition, construction and operation of a project contained in this
376 chapter solely by reason of a financial interest, direct or indirect, in any contract or extension
377 thereof for services with respect to the project report or otherwise with respect to the
378 development of the project executed by such person with the commonwealth or MassDOT prior
379 to the effective date hereof. For purposes of the foregoing, MassDOT shall have all of the powers
380 granted to it by General Law or special law not inconsistent with this chapter. Each project shall
381 be exempt from compliance with applicable zoning codes and any regulations promulgated
382 thereunder.
383 (b) MassDOT shall prepare quarterly reports for each project described by this chapter.
384 Said quarterly reports shall be submitted to the secretary of the executive office for
385 administration and finance, the house ways and means committee, the senate ways and means
386 committee, the clerk of the house and the clerk of the senate and posted on line on the MassDOT
387 website and shall include—
388 (1) the total dollars expended on the project to date,
19 of 28

389 (2) the number of contracts entered into to date;
390 (3) the number of contracts entered into with minority businesses;
391 (4) the number of contracts entered into with women-owned businesses;
392 (5) the dollar value of contracts entered into with minority businesses;
393 (6) the dollar value of contracts entered into with women-owned businesses;
394 (7) the total number of employees working on the project; and
395 (8) the total number of employees working on the project, broken down by race, ethnicity
396 and gender.
397 Section 12. Upon the secretary’s certification of receipt of a determination made pursuant
398 to section 6, the state treasurer shall issue bonds in such amounts and at such time as the state
399 treasurer determines, after consultation with the secretary and MassDOT, necessary to meet the
400 expenditures required for the project which is the subject of said determination. Any such bonds
401 shall be special obligations of the commonwealth payable first from the project funds created
402 pursuant to section 7 to the extent available and second from the unsegregated funds described in
403 section 3.
404 Section 13. The administration of the fees imposed under section 6 is hereby vested in the
405 commissioner of revenue. Said fees shall be collected by the municipal tax officials and remitted
406 to the department of revenue on a quarterly basis. All provisions of this chapter relative to
407 assessment, collection, payment, abatement, verification and administration, including penalties
408 and interest, shall, so far as pertinent, be applicable to the fees imposed by this chapter as though
409 they were taxes enumerated in section 2 of chapter 62C.
20 of 28

410 Section 14. MassDOT or its successor shall pursue any Federal funds for which the
411 projects, or any portions thereof, are eligible and to seek or coordinate with partners where
412 warranted.
413 Section 15. Regional Planning Agencies.
414 (a) MassDOT shall choose a regional planning agency or agencies established pursuant to
415 chapter 40B to conduct corridor land use planning for the projects. Each regional planning
416 agency or agencies shall work with municipalities, state agencies and other stakeholders to
417 complete land use corridor plans. Each land use corridor plan shall include the necessary actions
418 to be taken by municipal or state government, including zoning and other bylaw changes, in
419 order to maximize the long term benefit of the expansion, preserve capacity added by the project,
420 promote sustainable economic and residential development, protect critical open space and other
421 natural resources, and mitigate environmental and neighborhood impacts, including sprawl and
422 gentrification.
423 (b) MassDOT or its successor shall not begin construction on new rail stations to be
424 completed pursuant to chapter 161E until the secretary finds that the municipality in which the
425 station would be located has taken substantial actions to implement the applicable provisions and
426 requirements of the corridor land use plan and have taken actions to reasonably ensure ongoing
427 implementation of the plan after construction is complete.
428 (c) One-tenth of one per cent of the cost of each project shall be used for corridor land
429 use planning pursuant to this section, and shall be allocated from the Fund to the regional
430 planning agencies identified by MassDOT for the purposes of corridor land use planning
21 of 28

431 pursuant to this section. Each regional planning agency receiving funds shall file a report with
432 MassDOT and the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing their activities.
433 Section 16. The provisions of this chapter shall be deemed to provide an exclusive,
434 additional, alternative and complete method for the doing of the things authorized hereby and
435 shall be deemed and construed to be supplemental and additional to, and not in derogation of,
436 powers conferred upon MassDOT or its successor; provided, however, that insofar as the
437 provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any General Law or special law,
438 administrative order or regulation or any limitation imposed by a corporate or municipal charter,
439 the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.
440 Section 17. Bonding Authority.
441 (a) To meet the expenditures necessary to carry out the provisions of section 2, the state
442 treasurer may issue and sell bonds of the commonwealth in any amount. Any such bonds shall be
443 special obligations of the commonwealth payable first from the project funds described in
444 section 7 to the extent available and second from the receipts described in section 3 to the extent
445 available.
446 (b) Bonds of the commonwealth may be issued under authority of this section in such
447 manner and on such terms and conditions as the state treasurer, with the concurrence of the
448 secretary of administration and finance, may determine in accordance with the provisions of this
449 subsection and, to the extent not inconsistent with the provisions hereof, provisions of General
450 Law for the issuance of bonds of the commonwealth. Bonds may be secured by a trust agreement
451 or other security agreement entered into by the state treasurer, with the concurrence of the
452 secretary of administration and finance, on behalf of the commonwealth, which trust agreement
22 of 28

453 or other security agreement may pledge or assign all or any part of the local project receipts
454 credited to the fund pursuant to sections 3 and 6, and any other pledged funds as hereinafter
455 provided, and rights to receive the same, whether existing or coming into existence and whether
456 held or thereafter acquired, and the proceeds thereof. The state treasurer is further authorized,
457 with the concurrence of the secretary of administration and finance, to enter into additional
458 security, insurance or other forms of credit enhancement which may be secured on a parity or
459 subordinate basis with the bonds. A pledge in any such trust or other security agreement or credit
460 enhancement agreement shall be valid and binding from the time such pledge shall be made
461 without any physical delivery or further act, and the lien of such pledge shall be valid and
462 binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise, irrespective
463 of whether such parties have notice thereof. Any such pledge shall be perfected by filing of the
464 trust or other security agreement or credit enhancement agreement in the records of the state
465 treasurer, and no filing need be made under chapter 106 of the General Laws. Any such trust
466 agreement, security agreement or credit enhancement agreement may establish provisions
467 defining defaults and establishing remedies and other matters relating to the rights and security
468 of the holders of the bonds or other secured parties as determined by the state treasurer, including
469 provisions relating to the establishment of reserves, the issuance of additional or refunding
470 bonds, whether or not secured on a parity basis, the application of the moneys and funds pledged
471 pursuant to such agreement, in this chapter referred to as pledged funds, and other matters
472 deemed necessary or desirable by the state treasurer for the security of such bonds, and may also
473 regulate the custody, investment and application of moneys.
474 (c) As additional security for bonds of the commonwealth issued under authority of this
475 section, the state treasurer, with the concurrence of the secretary of administration and finance,
23 of 28

476 shall create and establish a special fund for each project, herein referred to as the Capital Reserve
477 Funds, within the Fund established under section 3 or otherwise under a trust or other security
478 agreement securing such bonds, and shall pay into the capital reserve funds any receipts
479 available for such purpose pursuant to section 3 and any other moneys appropriated and made
480 available for the purposes of such fund, any proceeds of such bonds to the extent determined by
481 the state treasurer, with the concurrence of the secretary of administration and finance, or as may
482 be provided in any such trust or other security agreement, and any other moneys available for
483 purposes of such fund as provided in this section, all of which shall be pledged funds for
484 purposes of this chapter.
485 (d) All moneys held in the Capital Reserve Funds, except as hereinafter provided, shall be
486 used solely for the payment of the principal of bonds of the commonwealth issued under
487 authority of this section as the same mature, the purchase of such bonds, the payment of interest
488 on such bonds or the payment of any redemption premium required to be paid when such bonds
489 are redeemed prior to maturity; provided, however, that, moneys in the Capital Reserve Funds
490 shall not be withdrawn therefrom at any time in such amount as would reduce the amount of any
491 such fund to less than the maximum amount of principal and interest maturing and becoming due
492 in any succeeding fiscal year on all such bonds outstanding or such lesser amount as shall be
493 established by the state treasurer, with the concurrence of the secretary of administration and
494 finance, as necessary or appropriate to secure such bonds, in this chapter referred to as the
495 “capital reserve fund requirements”, except for the purpose of paying the principal of and interest
496 on such bonds maturing and becoming due and for the payment of which other receipts held in
497 the funds are not available.
24 of 28

498 (e) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the state treasurer may not issue bonds
499 of the commonwealth under authority of this section at any time if following such issuance the
500 balance on deposit in the Capital Reserve Funds would be less than the capital reserve fund
501 requirements with respect to all such bonds then outstanding.
502 (f) If on the last day of any fiscal year during which any bonds of the commonwealth
503 issued under authority of this section are outstanding, the balance on deposit in the Capital
504 Reserve Funds shall be less than the capital reserve fund requirements as then calculated, after
505 deposit therein of all amounts available therefore in the funds or otherwise under the trust or
506 other security agreement securing such bonds, the motor fuel excise tax shall be increased and all
507 newly created revenue directed into the Fund until the balance of said capital reserve fund shall
508 again equal the capital reserve fund requirement as so certified by the secretary of administration
509 and finance; provided, however, that the total amount of the excise imposed pursuant to sections
510 3 and 3A of chapter 64G of the General Laws and section 22 of chapter 546 of the acts of 1969
511 shall not exceed 14 per cent.
512 (g) In order to increase the marketability of any bonds issued by the commonwealth
513 under authority of this section, and in consideration of the acceptance of payment for any such
514 bonds, the commonwealth covenants with the purchasers, and all subsequent holders and
515 transferees of any such bonds, that until all such bonds, including all bonds issued to refund such
516 bonds, and the interest thereon, shall be paid or, if earlier, shall be deemed paid within the
517 meaning of any trust or other security agreement or credit enhancement agreement securing the
518 same, that—
519 (1) the receipts shall not be diverted from the purposes identified in this chapter;
25 of 28

520 (2) no pledged funds shall be diverted from the funds established by section 3 or the
521 Capital Reserve Funds, except as provided in this chapter;
522 (3) in any fiscal year of the commonwealth, unless and until an appropriation has been
523 made which is sufficient to pay the principal, including sinking fund payments, of and interest on
524 all such bonds and to provide for or maintain any reserves, additional security, insurance or other
525 form of credit enhancement required or provided for in any trust or other security agreement or
526 credit enhancement agreement securing any such bonds or notes, no pledged funds shall be
527 applied to any other use; and
528 (4) so long as such revenues are necessary, as determined by the state treasurer in
529 accordance with any applicable trust or other security agreement or credit enhancement
530 agreement, for the purposes for which they have been pledged, the rate of any fees imposed by
531 this chapter or which may constitute pledged funds under this section shall not be reduced below
532 the amount in effect at the time of issuance of any such bond.
533 (h) Any bonds issued under authority of this section, and any notes of the commonwealth
534 issued in anticipation thereof as hereinafter provided, shall be deemed to be investment securities
535 under chapter 106 of the General Laws, shall be securities in which any public officer, fiduciary,
536 insurance company, financial institution or investment company may properly invest funds and
537 shall be securities which may be deposited with any public custodian for any purpose for which
538 the deposit of bonds is authorized by law. Any such bonds and notes, their transfer and the
539 income therefrom, including profit on the sale thereof, shall at all times be exempt from taxation
540 by and within the commonwealth.
26 of 28

541 Section 18. The state treasurer may borrow on the credit of the commonwealth such sums
542 of money as may be necessary for the purposes of meeting payments as authorized by chapter
543 161E in anticipation of the receipt of proceeds of special obligation bonds of the commonwealth
544 issued under the authority of section 17, and may issue and renew notes of the commonwealth
545 therefore, bearing interest payable at such time and at such rate as shall be fixed by the state
546 treasurer. Such notes shall be issued and may be renewed one or more times for such maximum
547 term of years, not exceeding 7 years, as the governor may recommend to the general court in
548 accordance with Section 3 of Article LXII of the Amendments to the Constitution; provided,
549 however, that all such notes shall be payable no later than 7 years after issuance. Notes and the
550 interest thereon issued under MassDOT of this section, notwithstanding any other provisions of
551 this chapter, shall be general obligations of the commonwealth.
552 Section 19. This chapter shall be construed in all respects so as to meet all constitutional
553 requirements. In carrying out the purposes and provisions of this act, all steps shall be taken
554 which are necessary to meet constitutional requirements whether or not such steps are required
555 by statute.
556 SECTION 4. Effective Date for Section 3. The provisions of section 3 shall take effect on
557 the first day of the first full calendar month following 30 days after the enactment this Act.
558 SECTION 5. North South Rail Link.
559 (a) Section 1 of chapter 161C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official
560 Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:–
561 “Furthermore, to carry out the purposes of this section, the Commonwealth of
562 Massachusetts shall preserve intact the right-of-way for the proposed North South Rail Link.
27 of 28

563 This right-of-way is extremely vulnerable to the impact of development and redevelopment
564 around the existing rail tracks and terminals. In addition, rail projects already in the planning and
565 construction phases will exceed the capacity of the South Station terminal. Preservation of the
566 right-of-way for the North-South Rail Link will assure that rail transportation can be enhanced or
567 expanded in our region.”.
568 (b) Chapter 161C of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 8 the
569 following section:–
570 “Section 9. The Massachusetts department of transportation, or its successor, shall
571 perform a study to specifically identify and map the necessary right-of-way to allow for the
572 construction of the proposed North South Rail Link connecting North Station to South Station.
573 This study must include particular reference to the Major Investment Study/Draft Environmental
574 Impact Report (EOEA#10270), prepared under the aegis of the executive office of environmental
575 affairs, which was concluded on March 31, 2003. A plan to preserve said right-of-way, once
576 identified, shall be determined and implemented immediately.”.
28 of 28